Wyoming, session 2026, HB0046.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-22-101, 39-22-103, 39-22-105(b)
and 39-22-107(a) are amended to read:

CHAPTER 22
TAX UPON PRODUCTION OF ELECTRICITY FROM WIND, SOLAR
AND NUCLEAR RESOURCES
HB0046

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0190

39-22-101. Definitions.

There are no specific applicable provisions for definitions
for As used in this chapter, "generating facility" means
any facility generating electricity from wind or solar
resources in this state and any facility generating
electricity from a nuclear reactor in this state.

39-22-103. Imposition.

There is levied an excise tax upon the privilege of
producing electricity from wind, solar and nuclear
generating resources in this state. The tax shall be
imposed upon the production of any electricity produced
from wind resources for sale or trade on or after January
1, 2012, by the generating facility and shall be paid by
the person producing such electricity. The tax shall be
imposed on each megawatt hour of electricity produced from
wind resources the generating facility at the point of
interconnection with an electric transmission line.

39-22-105. Exemptions.
HB0046

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0190

(b) Electricity produced from a wind turbine the
generating facility shall not be subject to the tax imposed
under this chapter until the date three (3) years after the
turbine generating facility first produced electricity for
sale. After such date the production shall be subject to
the tax, as provided by W.S. 39-22-103, regardless of
whether production first commenced prior to or after
January 1, 2012.

39-22-107. Compliance; collection procedures.

(a) Returns and reports. Any person producing
electricity from wind resources within this state which is
subject to the tax imposed by this chapter shall report the
amount of megawatt hours produced in this state on or
before February 1 of the year immediately following the
year in which the electricity was produced.

Section 2. W.S. 39-23-101 through 39-23-111 are
repealed.

HB0046

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0190
Section 3. This act shall apply to electricity
generated from solar resources or from nuclear generating
facilities on or after January 1, 2027.

Section 4. This act is effective January 1, 2027.

(END)
HB0046